Utah statutes.
53-11-110.   Bail enforcement agent as agency -- Bond -- Workers' compensation.

(1)  An applicant for licensure as a bail enforcement agent who will operate a bail bond recovery agency shall provide the following information as part of the application:

(a)  the full name and business address of the applicant;

(b)  two passport-size color photographs of the applicant;

(c)  the name under which the applicant intends to conduct the business;

(d)  a statement that the applicant intends to engage in the bail bond recovery business;

(e)  a notarized statement of the applicant's qualifications as required by Sections 53-11-108 and 53-11-109;

(f)  the fee required by Section 53-11-115;

(g)  a certificate of workers' compensation insurance, if applicable; and

(h)  proof of completion of a training program approved by the board.

(2)  The license for a bail enforcement agent shall indicate on its face if the holder is licensed to act as a bail bond recovery agency.

